Rhode Island, session 2025, SB102.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7.2-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.2 entitled "The
Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.2-4. Determination of state’s share.
(a) For each district, the state’s share of the foundation education aid calculated pursuant
to § 16-7.2-3(a) shall use a calculation that considers a district’s revenue-generating capacity and
concentration of high-need students. The calculation is the square root of the sum of the state share
ratio for the community calculation, pursuant to § 16-7-20, squared plus the district’s percentage
of students in grades PK-6 in poverty status squared, divided by two.
If this calculation results in a state share ratio that is less than the state share ratio for the
community calculated pursuant to § 16-7-20(a) and that district’s poverty status percentage as
defined in § 16-7.2-3(a)(2) is greater than fifty percent (50%), the state share ratio shall be equal to
the state share ratio for the community calculated pursuant to § 16-7-20(a).
(b) For purposes of determining the state’s share, school district student data used in this
calculation shall include charter school and state school students. These ratios are used in the
permanent foundation education aid formula calculation described in § 16-7.2-5.
(c) There shall be a poverty loss stabilization fund for districts that experience a decline in
the state share ratio calculated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section from the prior year of more
than 2.0 percent (2%). The amount shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of the difference in the

amount of permanent foundation education aid received pursuant to § 16-7.2-3 received in the prior
year.
(d) In any given fiscal year, the total education aid paid to a local education agency,
including distributed categorical funds, shall not be reduced by more than one percent (1%) of the
municipal education appropriation to the local education agency in the previous fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000396
========
LC000396 - Page 2 of 3